src/fst/affixes/verbs.lexc
!! Divvun & Giellatekno - open source grammars for Sámi and other languages
! Copyright © 2000-2010 The University of Tromsø & the Norwegian Sámi Parliament
! http://giellatekno.uit.no & http://divvun.no

! This program is free software; you can redistribute and/or modify
! this file under the terms of the GNU General Public License as published by
! the Free Software Foundation, either version 3 of the License, or
! (at your option) any later version. The GNU General Public License
! is found at http://www.gnu.org/licenses/gpl.html. It is
! also available in the file $GTHOME/LICENSE.txt.

! Other licensing options are available upon request, please contact
! giellatekno@uit.no or feedback@divvun.no

! ==========================================================================
!                     North Sámi morphological analyser
! ==========================================================================



!     ================
!! # Verb conjugation
!     ================



!    ---------------------------------
!! ## Basic lexica for bisyllabic verbs
!    ---------------------------------


!! ### Modals
! ------

!! These are treated separately because
!!  modals do not participate in derivation

LEXICON GALGA_IV !!≈ * **@CODE@** only dáidit, galgat
 +V+IV+Ind+Prs:%> PrsV ;
 +V+IV+Ind+Prt:%> PrtV ;
 +V+IV+Pot+Prs:%>Q7ž PotC ;
 +V+IV+Cond:%> CondV1 ;
 +V+IV:%> NominalFormsV1 ;
 +V+IV:%>X2 NominalFormsV4 ;
 +V+IV+Der4+Der/muš+N+Use/-Spell:»mušš MUSH ;



LEXICON FERTE_IV !!≈ * **@CODE@**  only fertet and bállet
 +V+IV+Ind+Prs:%>Y5 VSufDOHPPE ;
 +V+IV+Cond:%>Y5 CondV2 ;
 +V+IV+Pot+Prs:%>Y5ž PotC ;
 +V+IV+Ind:%>j CSufDOHPPE ;
 +V+IV+Ind+Prt:%>Y6 PrtV1 ;
 +V+IV:%> NominalFormsV4 ;
 +V+IV:%> NominalFormsV1 ;
 +V+IV+Der4+Der/muš+N+Use/-PLX:»mušš MUSH ;
 +V+IV+Der4+Der/NomAct+N:»m PRE_BOAHTALADDAN ; !Turi: fertema



!! ### Ordinary bisyllabic verbs
!!! 1. DEFAULT SECTION
!   -------------------------


LEXICON DIEHTI_TV       !!≈ * **@CODE@** Bisyllabic i-verbs with Personal Passive, diphthong
 +V+TV:%> DIEHTIStem ;
 +V+TV: DeverbalVerbsDIEHTI ;

LEXICON ADDI_TV       !!≈ * **@CODE@** Bisyllabic i-verbs with Personal Passive, monophthong
 +V+TV:%> DIEHTIStem ;
 +V+TV: DeverbalVerbsDIEHTI ;


LEXICON BORRA_TV       !!≈ * **@CODE@** Bisyllabic a-verbs with Personal Passive, monophthong
 +V+TV:%> DIEHTIStem ;
 +V+TV: DeverbalVerbsBORRA ;
 +V+TV+PrfPrc+Err/Ortha:Q1n K ; !borrán

LEXICON DEAIVA_TV       !!≈ * **@CODE@** Bisyllabic a-verbs with Personal Passive, diphthong
 +V+TV:%> DIEHTIStem ;
 +V+TV: DeverbalVerbsBORRA ;
 +V+TV+PrfPrc+Err/Ortha:Q1n K ; !deaiván

LEXICON GAIKU_TV       !!≈ * **@CODE@** Bisyllabic u-verbs with Personal Passive, monophthong
 +V+TV:%> DIEHTIStem ;
 +V+TV: DeverbalVerbsBORRA ;
 +V+TV+PrfPrc+Err/Ortha:Q1n K ; !gaikun

LEXICON DOALVU_TV       !!≈ * **@CODE@** Bisyllabic u-verbs with Personal Passive, diphthong
 +V+TV:%> DIEHTIStem ;
 +V+TV: DeverbalVerbsBORRA ;
 +V+TV+PrfPrc+Err/Ortha:Q1n K ; !doalvun


LEXICON BOAHTI_IV  !!≈ * **@CODE@**  Bisyllabic i-verbs without Personal Passive but with Der/NomAg, diphthong
 +V+IV:%> BOAHTIStem ;
 +V+IV: DeverbalVerbsBOAHTI ;

LEXICON CIVKI_IV  !!≈ * **@CODE@**  Bisyllabic i-verbs without Personal Passive but with Der/NomAg, monophthong
 +V+IV:%> BOAHTIStem ;
 +V+IV: DeverbalVerbsBOAHTI ;


LEXICON DIEVVA_IV  !!≈ * **@CODE@**  Bisyllabic a- and u-verbs without Personal Passive but with Der/NomAg
 +V+IV:%> BOAHTIStem ;
 +V+IV: DeverbalVerbsDIEVVA ;
 +V+IV+PrfPrc+Err/Ortha-a-á:Q1n K ; !dievván

LEXICON BIEHKU_IV  !!≈ * **@CODE@**  Bisyllabic a- and u-verbs without Personal Passive but with Der/NomAg
 +V+IV:%> BOAHTIStem ;
 +V+IV: DeverbalVerbsDIEVVA ;
 +V+TV+PrfPrc+Err/Ortha:Q1n K ; !biehkun

LEXICON SUHKA_IV  !!≈ * **@CODE@**  Bisyllabic a- and u-verbs without Personal Passive but with Der/NomAg
 +V+IV:%> BOAHTIStem ;
 +V+IV: DeverbalVerbsDIEVVA ;
 +V+IV+PrfPrc+Err/Ortha-a-á:Q1n K ; !suhkán






!! ### Bisyllabic verbs
!!! 2. SPECIAL SECTION:
!!! 2a. special kind of u-verbs
!!! 2b. Already derived words - no deverbal verbs
!!! 2c. impersonals
!!! 2d. lexicas tweaked (mostly) for speller reasons
!!! 2e. lexicas for special compound behavious
!!! 2f. other special lexicas
!   -------------------------



!!! 2a. special kind of u-verbs
!   ------------------------------------------

LEXICON DEAKCU_TV   !!≈ * **@CODE@** as BORRA for u-verbs with dim -astit, and a-verbs with dim -istit that are hardcoded
 +V+TV:%> DIEHTIStem ;
 +V+TV: DeverbalVerbsBOLTU ;


LEXICON BOAZZU_IV  !!≈ * **@CODE@** as DIEVVA_IV for u-verbs with dim -astit, and a-verbs with dim -istit that are hardcoded
 +V+IV:%> BOAHTIStem ;
 +V+IV: DeverbalVerbsBINDU ;


LEXICON BINDU_IV  !!≈ * **@CODE@** as DIEVVA (but without short passive) for u-verbs with dim -astit, that are hardcoded
 +V+IV:%>Y7j SG3PASS ;
 +V+IV+Der3+Der/PassL+V+IV+Der4+Der/supmi+N+Sg+Ill+Use/-PLX:»Y7supmái K ;
 +V+IV:%> BOAHTIINCH ;
 +V+IV: DeverbalVerbsBINDU ;

LEXICON DAHTU_TV  !!≈ * **@CODE@**  As diehti, but -ut verbs, thus without short passive
 +V+TV:%>Y7j PASSIVE ;
 +V+TV+Der3+Der/PassL+V+IV+Der4+Der/supmi+N+Sg+Ill+Use/-PLX:»Y7supmái K ;
 +V+TV:%> DIEHTIINCH ;
 +V+TV: DeverbalVerbsBORRA ;

LEXICON BOLTU_TV  !!≈ * **@CODE@**  As DAHTU_TV but with dim -astit that are harcoded
 +V+TV:%>Y7j PASSIVE ;
 +V+TV+Der3+Der/PassL+V+IV+Der4+Der/supmi+N+Sg+Ill+Use/-PLX:»Y7supmái K ;
 +V+TV:%> DIEHTIINCH ;
 +V+TV: DeverbalVerbsBOLTU ;

LEXICON ALLU_IV  !!≈ * **@CODE@**  -ut verbs, thus without short passive
 +V+IV:%>Y7j SG3PASS ;
 +V+IV:%> BOAHTIINCH ;
 +V+IV: DeverbalVerbsDIEVVA ;


!!!! 2b. Already derived words - no deverbal verbs
!   ---------------------------------------------


LEXICON DIEHTALADDA_TV    !!≈ * **@CODE@** Already derived words (except words ending -uššat and -httit) - no deverbal verbs
 +V+TV:%> DIEHTALADDAStem ;

LEXICON LAIGOHADDA_TV   !!≈ * **@CODE@** láigohaddat. No deverbal nouns for speller reasons. No +Imprt+Pl2: láigohaddit
 +V+TV:%> LAIGOHADDAStem ;


LEXICON HAHTTIT_TV    !!≈ * **@CODE@** Four-syll kausatives on -httit
 +V+TV:%> DIEHTIStem ;

LEXICON BOAHTALADDA_IV  !!≈ * **@CODE@** Already derived words (except words ending -uššat)
 +V+IV:%> BOAHTALADDAStem ;
 +V+IV+PrfPrc+Err/Orth:Q1n K ;

LEXICON RAIMMAHALLA_IV      !!≈ * **@CODE@** passives on -hallat and INCHOATIVES on -stuvvat
 +V+IV:%> RAIMMAHALLAINCH ;

LEXICON UVVA_IV      !!≈ * **@CODE@** passives -uvvat
    UVVA_IV_NO_ErrOrth_uvvot ;
 +V+IV+Err/Orth:uvvo%> BOAHTICnj ; !billahuvvon, dáhpáhuvvo
