src/fst/stems/verbs.lexc
LEXICON Humsubj-VGenVerbs
šlivgut:šlivºgu BOLTU_TV ;
LEXICON Humsubj-VerbRoot   !!= * **@CODE@**
bastit:basºti CIVKI_IV ;
bearrat:bearra DEAIVA_TV ;
bostit:bosºti ADDI_TV ;
bállet:bálle FERTE_IV ;
ceavzit:ceavºzi BOAHTI_IV ;
cuvzat:cuvºza BORRA_TV ;
deakčut:deakºču DEAKCU_TV ;
doadjit:doadºji DIEHTI_TV ;
duohpat:duohºpa DEAIVA_TV ;
duolbmut:duolbmu DEAKCU_TV ;
duoldat:duolºda DIEVVA_IV ;
duovlut:duovºlu DOALVU_TV ;
dáidit:dájºdi GALGA_IV ;
dáidit+Err/Orth-a-á:dajºdi GALGA_IV ;
bajásdánsut:bajás#dánºsu BOLTU_TV ;
eretbidjat:eret#bidºja BORRA_TV ; !
fertet+v1:ferte FERTE_IV ;
fertet+v2:verte FERTE_IV ;
gaikut:gajºku GAIKU_TV ;
galgat+Err/Orth-a-á:gálºga GALGA_IV ;
galgat:galºga GALGA_IV ;
geafut:geafu BIEHKU_IV ;
geallat:gealla DEAIVA_TV ;
geandit:geanºdi DIEHTI_TV ;
gieđahallat+Err/Orth:giđahalla DIEHTALADDA_TV ;
gizzut:gizzu BOAZZU_IV ;
goargŋut:goargŋu BOAZZU_IV ;
gohcit:gohºci ADDI_TV ;
guovzat:guovºza DEAIVA_TV ;
guvrut:guvºru ALLU_IV ;
gárggiidahttit:gárggiidahtti HAHTTIT_TV ;
hárddáhallat+v1:hárddáhalla RAIMMAHALLA_IV ;
harrat:harra DIEVVA_IV ;
heaŋgut:heaŋºgu DEAKCU_TV ;
hilgut:hilºgu DAHTU_TV ;
himáhallat+Err/Orth:himohalla BOAHTALADDA_IV ;
hiŋkit:hiŋºki CIVKI_IV ;
háhkat:háhºka BORRA_TV ;
illastuvvat+Err/Lex:illast UVVA_IV ;
jeahkit:jeahºki DIEHTI_TV ;
jirkut:jirºku GAIKU_TV ;
loktit:lokºti ADDI_TV ;
luoddut:luoddu DEAKCU_TV ;
meallut:meallu BOAZZU_IV ;
muhkut:muhºku ALLU_IV ;
mulgut:mulºgu BOLTU_TV ;
muotkut:muotºku DOALVU_TV ;
neastit:neasºti DIEHTI_TV ;
njávkat:njávºka BORRA_TV ;
oadjudallat:oadjudalla DIEHTALADDA_TV ;
oahcut:oahºcu BIEHKU_IV ;
oažžut:oažžu DOALVU_TV ;
oktiičaskit:oktij#časºki ADDI_TV ;
olggosboahtit:olggos#boahºti BOAHTI_IV ;
ovdandivvut:ovdan#divvu DAHTU_TV ;
reavgut:reavºgu BOAZZU_IV ;
rihpat:rihºpa BORRA_TV ;
roahkasmahttit:roahkasmahtti HAHTTIT_TV ;
sierrat:sierra DEAIVA_TV ;
sihkkut:sihkku BOLTU_TV ;
smirezastit:smirezasºti BOAHTALADDA_IV ;
snealkut:snealºku DEAKCU_TV ;
soardit:soarºdi DIEHTI_TV ;
sollat:solla BORRA_TV ;
stullat:stulla DIEVVA_IV ;
vealggáiduvvat:vealggáid UVVA_IV ;
vulosdásástit:vulos#dásásti ADDI_TV ;
vuoigit:vuojºgi BOAHTI_IV ;
áigut:ájºgu GALGA_IV ; !FAUXV
álgit:álºgi CIVKI_IV ;
ássut:ássu DAHTU_TV ;
čallut:čallu BOAZZU_IV ;
čeahpput:čeahppu BIEHKU_IV ;
čiehkat:čiehºka DEAIVA_TV ;
šluhpat:šluhºpa DEAKCU_TV ;
čoaggit:čoaggi DIEHTI_TV ;
čuožžut:čuožžu BOAZZU_IV ;
čuoččáldahttit:čuoččáldahtti HAHTTIT_TV ;
eretváldit:eret#válºdi ADDI_TV ;
biekkahaddat:biekkahadda RAIMMAHALLA_IV ;
báikut:bájºku GAIKU_TV ;
likšat:likºša BORRA_TV ;
nirvut:nirºvu BINDU_IV ;
njuohpat:njuohºpa DEAIVA_TV ;
roaškut:roašºku DOALVU_TV ;
eretduvdit:eret#duvºdi ADDI_TV ;
ovddosdikšut:ovddos#dikºšu DAHTU_TV ;
lohpádallat+Err/Orth:lohppádalla DIEHTALADDA_TV ;
noaidáluššat+Err/Lex+Use/LIA:noaidálušša DIEVVA_IV ; ! LIA
liđgut:liđºgu BINDU_IV ;
šloavgit:šloavºgi BOAHTI_IV ;
LEXICON 3-VerbRoot
deadjut:deadºju BIEHKU_IV ;
váidut:vájºdu ALLU_IV ;
bistit:bisºti CIVKI_IV ;
arvvohallat:arvvohalla BOAHTALADDA_IV ;
beahttahuvvat:beahttah UVVA_IV ;
beaitit:beajºti DIEHTI_TV ;
bigohallat:bigohalla RAIMMAHALLA_IV ;
bindut:binºdu BINDU_IV ;
boalggahuhttit:boalggahuhtti HAHTTIT_TV ;
bunjostallat:bunjostalla DIEHTALADDA_TV ;
báddat:bádda BOAZZU_IV ;
cirgut:cirºgu BINDU_IV ;
ciskut:cisºku BINDU_IV ;
cábmohaddat:cábmohadda RAIMMAHALLA_IV ;
dugordallat:dugordalla BOAHTALADDA_IV ;
dáiddáruššat:dáiddárušša DIEVVA_IV ;
dávžut:dávºžu DAHTU_TV ;
eretsihkkut:eret#sihkku BOLTU_TV ;
fitnašuvvat:fitnaš UVVA_IV ;
fuorkut:fuorºku DOALVU_TV ;
fáhtehaddat:fáhtehadda RAIMMAHALLA_IV ;
fáškut:fášºku BINDU_IV ;
gaikkehastit:gaikke7hasºti DIEHTALADDA_TV ;
gavdut:gavºdu ALLU_IV ;
giivváskahttit:giivváskahtti HAHTTIT_TV ;
goassut:goassu BIEHKU_IV ;
guohpanjaddit:guohpa#njaddi CIVKI_IV ;
guolljut:guollju DEAKCU_TV ;
gurbut:gurbu GAIKU_TV ;
gársat:gárºsa BORRA_TV ;
gáččohallat:gáččohalla BOAHTALADDA_IV ;
hoaktit:hoakºti BOAHTI_IV ;
hoassat:hoassa DEAIVA_TV ;
hoiggahaddat:hoiggahadda RAIMMAHALLA_IV ;
jeaggiluvvat:jeaggil UVVA_IV ;
jástit:jásºti ADDI_TV ;
játnat:játna DIEVVA_IV ;
kámput:kámºpu ALLU_IV ;
lapmut:lapmu DAHTU_TV ;
liigudallat:liigudalla DIEHTALADDA_TV ;
liškut:lišºku BINDU_IV ;
luohkkáijuohkit:luohkkái#juohºki DIEHTI_TV ;
láigohaddat:láigohadda LAIGOHADDA_TV ;
meaššut:meaššu BIEHKU_IV ;
mieškit:miešºki BOAHTI_IV ;
moivváidahttit:moivváidahtti HAHTTIT_TV ;
molljut:mollju BINDU_IV ;
mágastaddat:mágastadda BOAHTALADDA_IV ;
nammašuvvat:nammaš UVVA_IV ;
njaddit:njaddi CIVKI_IV ;
njazzut:njazzu BOLTU_TV ;
njeadjut:njeadºju DOALVU_TV ;
ravdnut:ravdnu DAHTU_TV ;
ruibut:rujºbu ALLU_IV ;
ruoškit:ruošºki BOAHTI_IV ;
rávvehallat:rávºvehalla DIEHTALADDA_TV ;
ráŋggohaddat:ráŋggohadda RAIMMAHALLA_IV ;
saŋgat:saŋºga DIEVVA_IV ;
saŋgit+Err/Lex:saŋºgi ADDI_TV ; ! !XXXWhat is meaning of this?
seavdnjut:seavdnju BIEHKU_IV ;
servvoštaddat:servvoštadda BOAHTALADDA_IV ;
sildnašuvvat:sildnaš UVVA_IV ;
skáigit:skájºgi CIVKI_IV ;
smoarrut:smoarru DOALVU_TV ;
soarcat:soarºca DEAIVA_TV ;
spildut:spilºdu ALLU_IV ;
spádjut:spádºju BOLTU_TV ;
surggiidahttit:surggiidahtti HAHTTIT_TV ;
viidnejuhkat:viidne#juhºka DEAKCU_TV ;
visttehuvvat:vistte7h UVVA_IV ;
vuostáčuožžut+v1:vuostá#čuožžu DOALVU_TV ;
vuovzit:vuovºzi DIEHTI_TV ;
vurohallat:vurohalla DIEHTALADDA_TV ;
vállut:vállu DAHTU_TV ;
áhčástaddat:áhčástadda BOAHTALADDA_IV ;
čahpat:čahºpa BORRA_TV ;
čeallut:čeallu BOAZZU_IV ;
čeargat:čearºga DIEVVA_IV ;
šlietnjut:šlietnju BIEHKU_IV ;
šluohkkit:šluohkki BOAHTI_IV ;
čohkánahttit:čohkánahtti HAHTTIT_TV ;
čáhcut:čáhºcu ALLU_IV ;
šáigit:šájºgi CIVKI_IV ;
čárvvohallat:čárvvohalla RAIMMAHALLA_IV ;
oaššut:oaššu BOLTU_TV ;
